Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-668
Streams; water rights; priority.

In applying the provisions of law relating to the appropriation of water, priority of appropriation shall give the better right as between those using the water for the same purpose, but when the waters of any natural stream are not sufficient for the use of all those desiring to use the same, those using the water for domestic purposes shall have preference over those claiming it for any other purpose. Those using the water for agricultural purposes shall have the preference over those using the same for manufacturing purposes, and those using the water for agricultural purposes shall have the preference over those using the same for power purposes, where turbine or impulse water wheels are installed, or for instream-basin-management purposes.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 7, p. 349;

Laws 1941, c. 138, § 1, p. 545;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-707;

R.S.1943, § 70-668;

Laws 2016, LB1038, § 13.

A preferential use is given to waters used for irrigation purposes over waters used for power purposes. Hickman v. Loup River P. P. Dist., 173 Neb. 428, 113 N.W.2d 617 (1962).